Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-2611
Consumer reporting agency; restrictions with respect to third parties; request by third party; how treated.

(1) A consumer reporting agency may not suggest or otherwise state or imply to a third party that a security freeze on a consumer's or protected consumer's file reflects a negative credit score, history, report, or rating.

(2) If a third party requests access to a credit report or any other information derived from a file in connection with an application for credit or the opening of an account and the consumer, protected consumer, or representative has placed a security freeze on his or her file and does not allow his or her file to be accessed during that specified period of time, the third party may treat the application as incomplete.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 11;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 15.